Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1479.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 839.4 of Title 21, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. As used in this section:
1. “First responder” shall mean a full-time, part-time,
reserve, or volunteer, state, county, or municipal peace officer,
firefighter, paramedic, emergency medical technician, rescue service
personnel, emergency manager, medical examiner or employee of a
medical examiner, or wrecker service provider;
2. “Investigating agency” shall mean the municipal, county, or
state agency responsible for investigating and reporting a collision
to the Department of Public Safety or submitting a crime report to
the Oklahoma State Bureau of Investigation; and

SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1479 SFLR Page 1
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

3. “Scene support personnel” shall include, but not be limited
to, towing or remediation services, funeral homes, crime scene
cleaners, or municipal, county, and state road maintenance
employees.
B. 1. No first responder or scene support personnel shall
release to the public any scene-specific information or transmit to
a social media site any photographic image or video taken at a
collision or crime scene without prior authorization from the
investigating agency.
2. The provisions of paragraph 1 of this subsection shall not
be construed to prevent the Oklahoma State Bureau of Investigation
or the Oklahoma Highway Patrol from transmitting information when a
law enforcement agency requests investigative assistance.
C. Any agency or entity that employs first responders or scene
support personnel shall notify the employees of the provisions of
this act within ninety (90) days of the effective date of this act.
D. Any person convicted of a violation of this section shall be
guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by a fine not to exceed One
Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00), or by imprisonment in the county jail
not to exceed sixty (60) days, or by both such fine and
imprisonment.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.
COMMITTEE REPORT BY: COMMITTEE ON PUBLIC SAFETY
February 3, 2026 - DO PASS AS AMENDED

SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1479 SFLR Page 2
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)